Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2111 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Protection of Fundamental Rights and Public Policy Act”.


B. The Legislature finds that:

Req. No. 3128 Page 1


1. The Oklahoma Constitution and the Constitution of the United


States guarantee certain inalienable rights, including due process,


equal protection, freedom of speech, and bodily integrity;


2. Certain practices, whatever their source, directly


contradict these fundamental rights and the public policy of this


state; and


3. Oklahoma has a compelling interest in protecting all persons


within its jurisdiction from violence, coercion, and discrimination.


C. No person shall inflict or cause to be inflicted any of the


following acts upon another person as punishment, penalty, or


purported legal sanction:


1. Amputation of a limb or digit;


2. Stoning, flogging, whipping, or lashing;


3. Blinding or other deliberate destruction of an organ or


sense; or


4. Any other form of corporal mutilation or maiming.


D. Any contract, agreement, tribunal decision, or purported


judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding that imposes or authorizes any


act listed in subsection C of this section is contrary to the public


policy of this state and shall not be recognized or enforced by any


court or administrative agency.


E. It shall be unlawful to inflict or threaten physical


violence or psychological coercion upon any person for the purpose


of punishing perceived immorality, apostasy, blasphemy, or violation

Req. No. 3128 Page 2


of religious or cultural dress or behavior codes. Aggravated


assault, kidnapping, false imprisonment, or any other felony


committed with the motive described in this subsection shall be


punished at the highest degree provided by law.


F. 1. Female genital mutilation, including but not limited to


the surgical removal of the clitoris, excision, infibulation, or any


partial or total removal of or injury to the external female


genitalia for non-medical reasons, is prohibited and declared


contrary to the public policy of this state.


2. Any person who performs female genital mutilation shall be


guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more


than five (5) years and a fine not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars


($20,000.00). Consent by a minor or parent shall not be a defense.


3. In addition to criminal penalties, any physician, physician


in training, nurse, midwife, or other medical professional who


performs or participates in female genital mutilation shall have his


or her professional license or certification permanently revoked.


G. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit,


restrict, criminalize, or otherwise infringe upon the practice of


male circumcision when performed for religious, cultural, or medical


reasons, or with parental consent. Male circumcision is distinct


from and not considered equivalent to female genital mutilation


under this act or state law.

Req. No. 3128 Page 3


H. 1. In civil actions for damages against a perpetrator for


sexual assault, abuse, or related harms inflicted upon a minor


including, but not limited to, sexual assault and harms arising from


transgender-related medical mutilation, sterilization procedures, or


interventions performed coercively or in violation of fundamental


rights, the statute of limitations shall be extended to allow filing


up to the victim’s forty-fifth birthday, consistent with and


building upon existing extensions under Section 95 of Title 12 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. The extension described in paragraph 1 of this subsection


applies to minor victims of sexual assault and minor victims of


transgender mutilation to provide additional protections against


coercion or violation of bodily integrity.


I. 1. No marriage shall be contracted in this state, and no


marriage contracted outside this state shall be recognized, if any


party was under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of marriage.


2. No marriage shall be contracted or recognized if it was


entered into under force, fraud, or coercion, including coercion


based on family or community pressure.


3. Polygamous marriages or purported marriages shall not be


recognized for any purpose under Oklahoma law.


4. In all actions concerning marriage, divorce, spousal


maintenance, child custody, and inheritance, Oklahoma statutory and



Req. No. 3128 Page 4


common law shall apply exclusively. No court or arbitrator shall


apply, enforce, or give effect to any rule or body of rules that:


a. grants different inheritance rights based solely on


gender or religion,


b. grants different testimonial weight or credibility


based solely on gender or religion, or


c. denies or limits custody or visitation rights based


solely on a parent’s departure from or rejection of


any religious doctrine.


J. Any arbitration agreement or award shall be unenforceable to


the extent it requires the application of any rule or body of rules


that would violate subsections C through F of this section or any


other fundamental public policy of this state as expressed in the


Oklahoma Constitution or statutes. Any arbitration agreement or


award shall be unenforceable to the extent it requires the


application of any rule or body of rules that would violate


subsections C through F of this section or any other fundamental


public policy of this state as expressed in its Constitution or


statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3128 BLB 1/14/2026 3:14:04 PM





Req. No. 3128 Page 5